Utah statutes.
53A-13-203.   Enrollment of private school pupils.

(1)  A school district maintaining driver education classes shall allow pupils enrolled in grades nine to 12 of regularly established private schools located within the school district to enroll in the most accessible public school in the school district to receive driver education.

(2)  Enrollment is on the same terms and conditions as applies to students in public schools within the district, as such terms and conditions relate to the driver education classes only. 



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

